Massachusetts, session 194th, H1320.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 176O of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 12B the
following section:- 12C.
SECTION 1. (a) A carrier that uses a preauthorization process for health care services
shall not require a physician or provider to obtain preauthorization for a particular health care
service if, in the most recent six-month evaluation period, as described by subsection (b), the
carrier has approved or would have approved not less than 90 percent of the preauthorization
requests submitted by the physician or provider for the particular health care service.
(b) Except as provided by subsection (c), a carrier shall evaluate whether a physician
or provider qualifies for an exemption from preauthorization requirements under Subsection (a)
once every six months.
of 2

(c) A carrier may continue an exemption under subsection (a) without evaluating
whether the physician or provider qualifies for the exemption under subsection (a) for a
particular evaluation period.
(d) A physician or provider is not required to request an exemption under Subsection
(a) to qualify for the exemption.
(e) A carrier that determines a provider or physician qualifies for the exemption must
inform the provider or physician within 48 hours of determination.
SECTION 2. (a) A physician's or provider's exemption from preauthorization
requirement remains in effect for six months from the date of notification by the carrier or until:
(1) the 30th day after the date the carrier notifies the physician or provider of the
carrier's determination to rescind the exemption if the physician or provider does not appeal the
carrier’s determination; or
(2) if the physician or provider appeals the determination, the fifth day after the
date the appeal concludes and the rescission is confirmed.
SECTION 3. (a) Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
of 2